Missouri, session 2026, SB1711.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 227.241, to read as
follows:
227.241. 1. For the purposes of this section,
"electric transmissions facilities" shall include public
utilities, investor owned utilities, utility cooperatives,
municipal utilities, transmission only entities, and
merchant transmission line developers.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term
"highway" shall mean the public thoroughfare for vehicles,
including public interstate highways, freeways, controlled
access highways, and state and county highways.
3. Within highway rights-of-way, subject to reasonable
engineering, safety, and access requirements, the commission
and the department of transportation shall allow the
installation, operation, and maintenance of electric
transmission facilities, including high voltage and
interstate transmission facilities.
4. The commission and the Missouri department of
transportation shall develop uniform criteria for

SB 1711 2
longitudinal and parallel colocation of transmission
facilities within highway rights-of-way.
5. The duties of the commission and the department
shall include:
(1) Providing reasonable timelines and procedure for
review and approval of colocation requests;
(2) Ensuring the safety of the public and
infrastructure;
(3) Avoiding duplication of corridors where colocation
is feasible; and
(4) Imposing reasonable conditions for construction,
right-of-way access, maintenance coordination, and
restoration but shall not interfere with colocation.
6. The commission and department shall promulgate and
enforce reasonable rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓